New Jersey, session 221, A4295.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  New Jersey is home to a community of approximately 400,000 Indian-Americans who are vital participants in the economic, academic, civic, and social life of the State; b.  India is the most populous country in the world and has one of the worlds fastest-growing economies; c.  New Jersey maintains close ties with India culturally and economically, as India is New Jerseys second-largest foreign direct investor and more New Jersey residents who are immigrants hail from India than from any other country; d.  In September 2019, Governor Murphy lead a seven-day, six-city trade mission to India, with the goal of strengthening economic, cultural, and educational ties between New Jersey and India, and cultivating international investment in our State; e.  In the immediate aftermath of that trade mission, New Jersey secured over 1,200 new jobs from the expansion of three Indian companies with a presence in the State; f.  Continuing to attract international trade and investment opportunities between India and New Jersey is critical to building long-term, sustainable economic growth; and g.  The establishment of a New Jersey-India Commission will enhance New Jerseys ability to foster trade, investment, and cultural and educational exchanges between India and the State. 2.  There is established in, but not of the Department of State,  the New Jersey-India Commission.  The commission shall consist of no less than 35 and no more than 45 members, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Commission shall organize as soon as practicable after the appointment of its members, and shall convene as soon and as often as requested by the Governor or chairperson.  The Governor shall select a chairperson from among the members of the commission, who shall also serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  All members of the commission shall serve without compensation. To the extent necessary, the Department of State shall provide professional and clerical staff to the commission, which may include an employee of the Department of State who is designated to serve as the Executive Director of the commission. 3.  The purpose of the commission shall be to: (a) advance bilateral trade and investment between New Jersey and India; (b) encourage mutual economic support between New Jersey and India; (c) encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure and economies of New Jersey and India; (d) promote cultural and educational exchanges between New Jersey and India, including in areas of research, science, and technology; (e) study and initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to New Jersey and India; and (f) address similar issues as determined by the commission. 4.  The commission is authorized to call upon any department, office, division, or agency of the State to supply it with data or other information or assistance available to such agency as the commission deems necessary to discharge its duties. Each executive branch department and agency is hereby required, to the extent not inconsistent with law, to cooperate fully with the commission and to furnish the commission with such assistance on as timely a basis as is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the commission. 5.  The commission shall be purely advisory in nature and shall provide advice to the Governor and other executive branch departments and agencies as appropriate. Nothing in this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be construed to supersede any federal, State, or local law. 6.  The commission shall provide an annual report to the Governor and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1).  The report shall be posted on the website of the Department of State. 7.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT New Jersey is home to a community of approximately 400,000 Indian-Americans who are vital participants in the economic, academic, civic, and social life of the State.  New Jersey maintains close ties with India culturally and economically, as India is New Jerseys second-largest foreign direct investor and more New Jersey residents who are immigrants hail from India than from any other country. In September 2019, Governor Murphy lead a seven-day, six-city trade mission to India, with the goal of strengthening economic, cultural, and educational ties between New Jersey and India, and cultivating international investment in our State.  In the immediate aftermath of that trade mission, New Jersey secured over 1,200 new jobs from the expansion of three Indian companies with a presence in the State.  Continuing to attract international trade and investment opportunities between India and New Jersey is critical to building long-term, sustainable economic growth.  The establishment of a New Jersey-India Commission will enhance New Jerseys ability to foster trade, investment, and cultural and educational exchanges between India and the State. This bill establishes the New Jersey-India Commission.  The commission will consist of no less than 35 and no more than 45 members, who will be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  All members of the commission will serve without compensation. The purpose of the commission will be to: advance bilateral trade and investment between New Jersey and India; encourage mutual economic support between New Jersey and India; encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure and economies of New Jersey and India; promote cultural and educational exchanges between New Jersey and India, including in areas of research, science, and technology; study and initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to New Jersey and India; and address similar issues as determined by the commission. The commission will be purely advisory in nature and will provide advice to the Governor and other executive branch departments and agencies as appropriate. The commission will provide an annual report to the Governor and to the Legislature.  The report will be posted on the website of the Department of State. This bill is consistent with the provisions of Executive Order No. 354 of 2024, issued by Governor Murphy.